Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1213.
do enact as follows:AB1213,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB1213,27Section 2. 20.115 (4) (ds) of the statutes is created to read:AB1213,2,11820.115 (4) (ds) Dairy agriculture resilience investment now grant pilot 9program. Annually, the amounts in the schedule for providing grants under, and 10the administration of, the dairy agriculture resilience investment now grant pilot 11program under s. 93.54.AB1213,312Section 3. 93.54 of the statutes is created to read:AB1213,2,181393.54 Dairy agriculture resilience investment now grant pilot 14program. (1) Program. The department shall create a dairy agriculture 15resilience investment now grant pilot program, under which the department shall 16provide grants to dairy producers with fewer than 1,000 head of milking cows to 17fund projects designed to improve the dairy producers’ operational efficiency and 18resilience.AB1213,2,1919(2) Rules. The department may promulgate rules to administer this section.AB1213,2,2020